Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1112
County officers; mileage; rate; amount; allowance.

When it is necessary for any county officer or his or her deputy or assistants, except any county sheriff or his or her deputy, to travel on business of the county, he or she shall be allowed mileage at the rate per mile allowed by section 81-1176 for each mile actually and necessarily traveled by the most direct route if the trip or trips are made by automobile. If travel by rail or bus is economical and practical, he or she shall be allowed only the actual cost of rail or bus transportation upon the presentation of his or her bill for the same accompanied by a proper voucher to the county board of his or her county in like manner as is provided for as to all other claims against the county.

Laws 1943, c. 90, § 12, p. 302;

R.S.1943, § 23-1112;

Laws 1947, c. 71, § 1, p. 228;

Laws 1953, c. 58, § 1, p. 196;

Laws 1957, c. 70, § 1, p. 294;

Laws 1959, c. 84, § 1, p. 384;

Laws 1967, c. 125, § 1, p. 400;

Laws 1973, LB 338, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 625, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 691, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 615, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 25;

Laws 1985, LB 393, § 16;

Laws 1990, LB 893, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 697, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 8.